California statutes. Penal Code
 participate in the program. Any program established by the Judicial Council shall ensure that the licensee receives adequate and appropriate notice of the proposed suspension or nonrenewal of the licensee’s license and has an opportunity to contest the suspension or nonrenewal. The opportunity to contest may not require a court hearing.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Judicial Council, after consultation with the Franchise Tax Board with respect to collections under Section 19280 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, may provide for an amnesty program involving the collection of outstanding fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, and assessments, applicable either statewide or within one or more counties. The amnesty program shall provide that some or all of the interest or collections costs imposed on outstanding fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, and assessments may be waived if the remaining amounts due are paid within the
 amnesty period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 637, Sec. 10.   (AB 1818)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.011.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a court, during the course of its routine process to collect fees, fines, forfeitures, or other penalties imposed by a court due to a citation issued for the violation of a state or local law, obtains information indicating that a person under 25 years of age, who has been issued a citation for truancy, loitering, curfew violations, or illegal lodging that is outstanding or unpaid, is homeless or
 has no permanent address, the court shall not garnish the wages or levy against bank accounts of that person until that person is 25 years of age or older, as that age is recorded by that person’s credit report or other document already in the possession of, or previously provided to, the court.

(b) For purposes of this section a person is considered to be “homeless” or as having “no permanent address” if that person does not have a fixed, regular, adequate nighttime residence, or has a primary nighttime residence that is one
 of the following:

(1) A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations, including, but not limited to, welfare hotels, congregate shelters, and transitional housing for the mentally ill.

(2) An institution that provides a temporary residence for individuals intended to be institutionalized.

(3) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a court from engaging in any other lawful debt collection activities.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a court to perform any further investigation or financial screening into any matter beyond the scope of its regular duties.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the Judicial Council from altering any best practices or recommendations for collection programs pursuant to Section 1463.010.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a court from garnishing a person’s wages or levying against a person’s bank accounts if the court, subsequent to its initial determination that the person was a homeless youth exempt from wage garnishment or levy under this section, obtains evidence that the individual is no longer homeless.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 466, Sec. 2.   (AB 1111)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.012.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a court, during the course of its routine process to collect fees, fines, forfeitures, or other penalties imposed by a court due to a citation issued for the violation of a state or local law, obtains information indicating that a person who has been issued a citation for loitering, curfew violations, or illegal lodging that is outstanding or unpaid served in the military within the last eight years and is homeless or has no permanent address, the court shall not garnish the wages or levy against bank accounts of that person for five years from the date that the court obtained that information.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person is considered to be
 “homeless” or as having “no permanent address” if that person does not have a fixed, regular, adequate nighttime residence, or has a primary nighttime residence that is one of the following:

(1) A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations, including, but not limited to, welfare hotels, congregate shelters, and transitional housing for the mentally ill.

(2) An institution that provides a temporary residence for individuals intended to be institutionalized.

(3) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a court from engaging in any other lawful debt collection
 activities.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a court to perform any further investigation or financial screening into any matter beyond the scope of its regular duties.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the Judicial Council from altering any best practices or recommendations for collection programs pursuant to Section 1463.010.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a court from garnishing a person’s wages or levying against a person’s bank accounts if the court, subsequent to its initial determination that the person was a homeless veteran exempt from wage garnishment or levy under this section, obtains evidence that the individual is no longer homeless, or that the court had, on a previous occasion, suspended garnishment of that person’s wages or
 levying against that person’s bank accounts pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   (AB 508)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.02.

(a) On or before June 30, 2011, the Judicial Council shall establish a task force to evaluate criminal and traffic-related court-ordered debts imposed against adult and juvenile offenders. The task force shall be comprised of the following members:

(1) Two members appointed by the California State Association of Counties.

(2) Two members appointed by the League of California Cities.

(3) Two court executives, two judges, and two Administrative Office of the Courts employees appointed by the Judicial Council.

(4) One member
 appointed by the Controller.

(5) One member appointed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(6) One member appointed by the California Victim Compensation Board.

(7) One member appointed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(8) One member appointed by the Department of Finance.

(9) One member appointed by each house of the Legislature.

(10) A county public defender and a city attorney appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(11) A defense attorney in private practice and a district attorney appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(b) The Judicial Council shall designate a chairperson for the task force. The task force shall, among other duties, do all of the following:

(1) Identify all criminal and traffic-related court-ordered fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, and assessments imposed under law.

(2) Identify the distribution of revenue derived from those debts and the expenditures made by those entities that benefit from the revenues.

(3) Consult with state and local entities that would be affected by a simplification and consolidation of criminal and traffic-related court-ordered debts.

(4) Evaluate and make recommendations to the Judicial Council and the Legislature for consolidating and simplifying the
 imposition of criminal and traffic-related court-ordered debts and the distribution of the revenue derived from those debts with the goal of improving the process for those entities that benefit from the revenues, and recommendations, if any, for adjustment to the court-ordered debts.

(c) The task force also shall document recent annual revenues from the various penalty assessments and surcharges and, to the extent feasible, evaluate the extent to which the amount of each penalty assessment and surcharge impacts total annual revenues, imposition of criminal sentences, and the actual amounts assessed.

(d) The task force also shall evaluate and make recommendations to the Judicial Council and the Legislature on or before June 30, 2011, regarding the priority in which court-ordered debts should be satisfied and the use of comprehensive collection programs authorized pursuant to
 Section 1463.007, including associated cost-recovery practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 243.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.04.

Notwithstanding Section 1463, out of the moneys deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463, there shall be transferred once a month into the State Treasury to the credit of the Winter Recreation Fund an amount equal to 50 percent of all fines and forfeitures collected during the preceding month upon conviction or upon the forfeiture of bail from any person of any violation of Section 5091.15 of the Public Resources Code, and an amount equal to the remaining 50 percent shall be transferred to the county general fund and deposited in a special account which shall be used exclusively to pay for the cost of
 furthering the purposes of the California SNO-PARK Permit Program, including, but not limited to, the snow removal, maintenance, and development of designated parking areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 25.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.1.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law except Section 77009 of the Government Code, any trial court may elect, with prior approval of the Administrative Director of the Courts, to deposit in a bank account pursuant to Section 53679 of the Government Code, all moneys deposited as bail with the court, or with the clerk thereof.

All moneys received and disbursed through the bank account shall be properly and uniformly accounted for under any procedures the Controller may deem necessary. The Judicial Council may
 regulate the bank accounts, provided that its regulations are not inconsistent with those of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 812, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.7.

Funds transferred to the Regents of the University of California pursuant to Section 1462.3 may not be utilized to purchase land or to construct any parking facility. These funds shall be utilized for the development, enhancement, and operation of alternate methods of transportation of students and employees of the University of California and for the mitigation of the impact of off-campus student and employee parking in university communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 26.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.9.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1463, 50 percent of all fines and forfeitures collected upon conviction, or upon forfeiture of bail, for violations of Section 13002 of the Health and Safety Code, Sections 23111 and 23112, and subdivision (a) of Section 23113 of the Vehicle Code, and Section 374.3 of this code shall be kept separate and apart from any other fines and forfeitures. These fines and forfeitures shall, as soon as practicable after their receipt, be deposited with the county treasurer of the county in which the court is situated and shall be distributed as prescribed in Section 1463, except that the money
 distributed to any county or city shall be expended only for litter cleanup activities within that city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 27.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.10.

Notwithstanding Section 1463, fines and forfeitures which are collected for a conviction of a violation of Section 11366.7 of the Health and Safety Code and which are required to be deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463 shall be allocated as follows:

(a) To reimburse any local agency for the reasonable costs of the removal and disposal, or storage, of any chemical or drug, or any laboratory apparatus or device, sold by a person convicted under Section 11366.7 of the Health and
 Safety Code.

(b) The balance of the amount collected, if any, shall be deposited by the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 979, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.11.

Notwithstanding Sections 1463 and 1464 of this code and Section 76000 of the Government Code, moneys that are collected for a violation of subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 21453 of, subdivision (c) of Section 21454 of, or subdivision (a) of Section 21457 of, the Vehicle Code, and which are required to be deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463 of this code shall be allocated as follows:

(a) The first 30 percent of the amount collected shall be allocated to the general fund of the
 city or county in which the offense occurred.

(b) The balance of the amount collected shall be deposited by the county treasurer under Sections 1463 and 1464.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 852, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.12.

Notwithstanding Sections 1463 and 1464 of this code and Section 76000 of the Government Code, moneys that are collected for a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 21752 or Section 22450 of the Vehicle Code, involving railroad grade crossings, or Section 22451, 22452, or subdivision (c) of Section 22526 of the Vehicle Code, and that are required to be deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463 of this code shall be allocated as follows:

(a) If the offense occurred in an area
 where a transit district or transportation commission or authority established under Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000) of the Public Utilities Code provides rail transportation, the first 30 percent of the amount collected shall be allocated to the general fund of that transit district or transportation commission or authority to be used only for public safety and public education purposes relating to railroad grade crossings.

(b) If there is no transit district or transportation commission or authority providing rail transportation in the area where the offense occurred, the first 30 percent of the amount collected shall be allocated to the general fund of the county in which the offense occurred, to be used only for public safety and public education purposes relating to railroad grade crossings.

(c) The balance of the amount collected shall be deposited by the county
 treasurer under Section 1463.

(d) A transit district, transportation commission or authority, or a county that is allocated funds pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall provide public safety and public education relating to railroad grade crossings only to the extent that those purposes are funded by the allocations provided pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 716, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.13.

(a) Each county may develop, implement, operate, and administer an alcohol and drug problem assessment program for persons convicted of a crime in which the court finds that alcohol or substance abuse was substantially involved in the commission of the crime. This program may be operated in coordination with the program developed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 23645) of Chapter 4 of Division 11.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(1) A portion of any program established pursuant to
 this section shall include a face-to-face interview with each program participant.

(2) No person convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance or a related offense shall participate in any program established pursuant to this section.

(b) An alcohol and drug problem assessment report shall be made on each person who participates in the program. The report may be used to determine the appropriate sentence for the person. The report shall be submitted to the court within 14 days of the completion of the assessment.

(c) In any county in which the county operates an alcohol and drug problem assessment program under this section, a court may order any person convicted of a crime that involved the use of drugs or alcohol, including any person who is found to have been under the influence of
 drugs or alcohol during the commission of the crime, to participate in the assessment program.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in addition to any other fine or penalty assessment, there shall be levied an assessment of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) upon every fine, penalty, or forfeiture imposed and collected by the courts for a public offense wherein the court orders the offender to participate in a county alcohol and drug problem assessment program. The assessment shall only be levied in a county upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors of the county making that county subject to this section.

(e) The court shall determine if the defendant has the ability to pay the assessment. If the court determines that the defendant has the ability to pay the assessment then the court may set the amount to be reimbursed and order the
 defendant to pay that sum to the county in the manner which the court determines is reasonable and compatible with the defendant’s financial ability. In making a determination of whether a defendant has the ability to pay, the court shall take into account the amount of any fine imposed upon the defendant and any amount the defendant has been ordered to pay in victim restitution.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 1463 or 1464 of the Penal Code or any other provision of law, all moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a special account in the county treasury and shall be used exclusively to pay for the costs of developing, implementing, operating, maintaining, and evaluating alcohol and drug problem assessment and monitoring programs.

(g) On January 15 of each year, the treasurer of each county that administers an alcohol and drug problem assessment and monitoring
 program shall determine those moneys in the special account which were not expended during the preceding fiscal year, and shall transfer those moneys to the general fund of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.14.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1463, of the moneys deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463, fifty dollars ($50) of each fine collected for each conviction of a violation of Section 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153 of the Vehicle Code shall be deposited in a special account that shall be used exclusively to pay for the cost of performing for the county, or a city or special district within the county, analysis of blood, breath or urine for alcohol content or for the presence of drugs, or for services
 related to that testing. The sum shall not exceed the reasonable cost of providing the services for which the sum is intended.

On November 1 of each year, the treasurer of each county shall determine those moneys in the special account that were not expended during the preceding fiscal year, and shall transfer those moneys into the general fund of the county. The board of supervisors may, by resolution, assign the treasurer’s duty to determine the amount of money that was not expended to the auditor or another county officer. The county may retain an amount of that money equal to its administrative cost incurred pursuant to this section, and shall distribute the remainder pursuant to Section 1463. If the account becomes exhausted, the public entity ordering a test performed pursuant to this subdivision shall bear the costs of the test.

(b) The board of supervisors of a county may, by resolution,
 authorize an additional penalty upon each defendant convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code, of an amount equal to the cost of testing for alcohol content, less the fifty dollars ($50) deposited as provided in subdivision (a). The additional penalty authorized by this subdivision shall be imposed only in those instances where the defendant has the ability to pay, but in no case shall the defendant be ordered to pay a penalty in excess of fifty dollars ($50). The penalty authorized shall be deposited directly with the county, or city or special district within the county, that performed the test, in the special account described in subdivision (a), and shall not be the basis for an additional assessment pursuant to Section 1464, or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76010) of Title 8 of the Government Code.

For purposes of this subdivision, “ability to pay” means the overall capability of the defendant to pay the additional penalty
 authorized by this subdivision, taking into consideration all of the following:

(1) Present financial obligations, including family support obligations, and fines, penalties, and other obligations to the court.

(2) Reasonably discernible future financial position over the next 12 months.

(3) Any other factor or factors that may bear upon the defendant’s financial ability to pay the additional penalty.

(c) The Department of Justice shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.15.

Notwithstanding Section 1463, if a county board of supervisors establishes a combined vehicle inspection and sobriety checkpoint program under Section 2814.1 of the Vehicle Code, thirty-five dollars ($35) of the money deposited with the county treasurer under Section 1463.001 and collected from each fine and forfeiture imposed under subdivision (b) of Section 42001.2 of the Vehicle Code shall be deposited in a special account to be used exclusively to pay the cost incurred by the county for establishing and conducting the combined vehicle inspection and sobriety
 checkpoint program. The money allocated to pay the cost incurred by the county for establishing and conducting the combined checkpoint program pursuant to this section may only be deposited in the special account after a fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42001.2, and any penalty assessment thereon, has been collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 482, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.16.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1203.1 or 1463, fifty dollars ($50) of each fine collected for each conviction of a violation of Section 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153 of the Vehicle Code shall be deposited with the county treasurer in a special account for exclusive allocation by the county for the county’s alcoholism program, with approval of the board of supervisors, for alcohol programs and services for the general population. These funds shall be allocated through the local planning process and expenditures reported to the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11798.2 and subdivision (a) of Section 11818.5 of the Health and Safety Code. Programs shall be certified by the State Department of Health
 Care Services or have made application for certification to be eligible for funding under this section. The county shall implement the intent and procedures of subdivision (b) of Section 11812 of the Health and Safety Code while distributing funds under this section.

(b) In a county of the 1st, 2nd, 3rd, 15th, 19th, 20th, or 24th class, notwithstanding Section 1463, of the moneys deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463, fifty dollars ($50) for each conviction of a violation of Section 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153 of the Vehicle Code shall be deposited in a special account for exclusive allocation by the administrator of the county’s alcoholism program, with approval of the board of supervisors, for alcohol programs and services for the general population. These funds shall be allocated through the local planning process and expenditures reported to the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to subdivision
 (c) of Section 11798.2 and subdivision (a) of Section 11818.5 of the Health and Safety Code. For those services for which standards have been developed and certification is available, programs shall be certified by the State Department of Health Care Services or shall apply for certification to be eligible for funding under this section. The county alcohol administrator shall implement the intent and procedures of subdivision (b) of Section 11812 of the Health and Safety Code while distributing funds under this section.

(c) The Board of Supervisors of Contra Costa County may, by resolution, authorize the imposition of a fifty dollar ($50) assessment by the court upon each defendant convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code for deposit in the account from which the fifty dollar ($50) distribution specified in subdivision (a) is deducted.

(d) It is the
 specific intent of the Legislature that funds expended under this part shall be used for ongoing alcoholism program services as well as for contracts with private nonprofit organizations to upgrade facilities to meet state certification and state licensing standards and federal nondiscrimination regulations relating to accessibility for handicapped persons.

(e) Counties may retain up to 5 percent of the funds collected to offset administrative costs of collection and disbursement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 78.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.17.

(a) In a county of the 19th class, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, of the moneys deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463, fifty dollars ($50) for each conviction of a violation of Section 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153 of the Vehicle Code shall be deposited in a special account to be used exclusively to pay the cost incurred by the county or a city or special district within the county, with approval of the board of supervisors, for performing analysis of blood, breath, or urine for alcohol
 content or for the presence of drugs, or for services related to the testing.

(b) The application of this section shall not reduce the county’s remittance to the state specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 77201, paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 77201.1, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 77201.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 7.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.18.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1463, moneys which are collected for a conviction of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code and which are required to be deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463 shall be allocated as follows:

(1) The first twenty dollars ($20) of any amount collected for a conviction shall be transferred to the Restitution Fund. This amount shall be aggregated by the county treasurer and transferred to the
 State Treasury once per month for deposit in the Restitution Fund.

(2) The balance of the amount collected, if any, shall be deposited by the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463.

(b) The amount transferred to the Restitution Fund pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any amount of any additional fine or assessment imposed pursuant to Sections 1202.4 and 1203.04, as operative on or before August 3, 1995, or Section 13967, as operative on or before September 28, 1994, of the Government Code. The amount deposited to the Restitution Fund pursuant to this section shall be used for the purpose of indemnification of victims pursuant to Section 13965 of the Government Code, with priority given to victims of alcohol-related traffic offenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1077, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.20.

Notwithstanding any other law, fifty dollars ($50) of every parking penalty received by a local entity pursuant to Section 42001.5 of the Vehicle Code may be deposited by the treasurer of the local entity in a special account to be used by the local entity for the sole purposes of altering existing public facilities to make them accessible to persons with disabilities in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101, et seq.), and federal regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and covering the actual administrative cost of
 setting aside fifty dollars ($50) of every parking penalty received pursuant to Section 42001.5 of the Vehicle Code for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.22.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1463, of the moneys deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463, seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50) for each conviction of a violation of Section 16028 of the Vehicle Code shall be deposited by the county treasurer in a special account and allocated to defray costs of municipal and superior courts incurred in administering Sections 16028, 16030, and 16031 of the Vehicle Code. Any moneys in the special account in excess of the amount required to defray those costs shall be redeposited and
 distributed by the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1463, of the moneys deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463, three dollars ($3) for each conviction for a violation of Section 16028 of the Vehicle Code shall be initially deposited by the county treasurer in a special account, and shall be transmitted once per month to the Controller for deposit in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. These moneys shall be available, when appropriated, to defray the administrative costs incurred by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Sections 16031, 16032, 16034, and 16035 of the Vehicle Code. It is the intent of this subdivision to provide sufficient revenues to pay for all of the department’s costs in administering those sections of the Vehicle Code.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 1463, of the moneys
 deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463, ten dollars ($10) upon the conviction of, or upon the forfeiture of bail from, any person arrested or notified for a violation of Section 16028 of the Vehicle Code shall be deposited by the county treasurer in a special account and shall be transmitted monthly to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 422.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.25.

Notwithstanding Section 1203.1 or 1463, and in addition to any allocation under Section 1463.16, the moneys from alcohol abuse education and prevention penalty assessments collected pursuant to Section 23196 of the Vehicle Code shall be initially deposited by the county treasurer in a special county alcohol abuse and prevention fund for exclusive allocation by the county alcohol program administrator, subject to the approval of the board of supervisors, for the county’s alcohol abuse education and prevention program pursuant to Section 11802 of the Health and Safety Code.

A county shall
 not use more than 5 percent of the funds deposited in the special account for administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 33.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.26.

Notwithstanding Section 1463, out of moneys deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463, there shall be transferred, once a month, to the traffic fund of the city, an amount equal to one-third of all fines and forfeitures collected during the preceding month upon the conviction of, or upon the forfeiture of bail by, any person charged with a violation of Section 21655.5 or 21655.8 of the Vehicle Code within that city, and an amount equal to one-third of those fines and forfeitures shall be transferred into the general fund of the county, and an amount equal to one-third of those fines and forfeitures shall be
 transferred to the agency whose approval is required for high-occupancy vehicle lanes on state highways pursuant to Section 21655.6 of the Vehicle Code. If the arrest for a violation of either Section 21655.5 or 21655.8 of the Vehicle Code was not within a city, then 50 percent of the fines and forfeitures shall be transferred to the general fund of the county and 50 percent shall be transferred to the agency having authority to approve high-occupancy vehicle lanes pursuant to Section 21655.6 of the Vehicle Code. Money received by the agency having the authority to approve high-occupancy vehicle lanes pursuant to Section 21655.6 of the Vehicle Code shall be used by that agency for the purposes of improving traffic flow and traffic operations upon the state highway system within the jurisdiction of that agency. In counties where there exists a county transportation commission created pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000) of the Public Utilities Code, that commission is the agency for
 purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 34.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.27.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in addition to any other fine or penalty assessment, the board of supervisors of a county may, by resolution, authorize a fee of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) upon every fine, penalty, or forfeiture imposed and collected by the courts for a crime of domestic violence specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 243 and in Section 273.5. Notwithstanding Section 1463 or 1464, money collected pursuant to this section shall be used to fund domestic violence prevention
 programs that focus on assisting immigrants, refugees, or persons who live in a rural community. Counties with existing domestic violence prevention programs that assist those persons may direct funds to those programs.

(b) The court shall determine if the defendant has the ability to pay the fee imposed under this section. In making that determination, the court shall take into account the total amount of fines and restitution that the defendant is subject to, and may waive payment of this additional fee.

(c) The court shall deposit the moneys collected pursuant to this section in a fund designated by the board of supervisors, to be used as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 241, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.28.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for each option county, as defined by Section 77004 of the Government Code, which has adopted the resolution specified in subdivision (b), that portion of fines and forfeitures, whether collected by the courts or by other processing agencies, which are attributable to an increase in the bail amounts adopted subsequent to the resolution pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1269b which would otherwise be divided between the county and cities within the county shall be deposited into the
 county general fund up to the annual limit listed in subdivision (b) for that county. Fine and forfeiture increments which exceed the specified annual limit shall be divided between the county and the cities within the county as otherwise provided by law. The scheduled bail amounts in such a county may exceed the bail amounts established by the Judicial Council pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1269b.

(b) The counties which may adopt a resolution directing that future increments in fines and forfeitures as specified in subdivision (a) be deposited in the county general fund and the annual limit applicable to those counties is as follows:CountyAnnual LimitAlpine $ 300,000Amador 200,000Butte 900,000Calaveras 300,000Contra Costa 100,000Del Norte 200,000Fresno 700,000Humboldt 200,000Kings 300,000Lake 400,000Lassen 200,000Los Angeles 15,000,000Madera 600,000Mariposa 200,000Mendocino 600,000Modoc 200,000Mono 200,000Plumas 200,000San Benito 300,000San Diego 5,200,000San Joaquin 1,000,000Santa Clara 3,200,000Sierra 300,000Stanislaus 1,900,000Sutter 800,000Trinity 200,000Tulare 2,000,000Tuolumne 400,000Yolo 700,000Yuba 900,000(c) Except as provided in Sections 40200.3 and 40200.4 of the Vehicle Code, this section does not apply to the collection of parking penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 76.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1464.

(a) (1) Subject to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code, and except as otherwise provided in this section, there shall be levied a state penalty in the amount of ten dollars ($10) for every ten dollars ($10), or part of ten dollars ($10), upon every fine, penalty, or forfeiture imposed and collected by the courts for all criminal offenses, including all offenses, except parking offenses as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 1463, involving a violation of a section of the Vehicle Code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to the Vehicle Code.

(2) Any bail schedule adopted pursuant to Section 1269b or bail schedule adopted by the Judicial Council pursuant to
 Section 40310 of the Vehicle Code may include the necessary amount to pay the penalties established by this section and Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code, and the surcharge authorized by Section 1465.7, for all matters where a personal appearance is not mandatory and the bail is posted primarily to guarantee payment of the fine.

(3) The penalty imposed by this section does not apply to the following:

(A) Any restitution fine.

(B) Any penalty authorized by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code.

(C) Any parking offense subject to Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of the Vehicle Code.

(D) The state surcharge authorized by Section 1465.7.

(b) Where multiple offenses are involved, the state penalty shall be based upon the total fine or bail for each case. When a fine is suspended, in whole or in part, the state penalty shall be reduced in proportion to the suspension.

(c) When any deposited bail is made for an offense to which this section applies, and for which a court appearance is not mandatory, the person making the deposit shall also deposit a sufficient amount to include the state penalty prescribed by this section for forfeited bail. If bail is returned, the state penalty paid thereon pursuant to this section shall also be returned.

(d) In any case where a person convicted of any offense, to which this section applies, is in prison until the fine is satisfied, the judge may waive